Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201581-3402
Architecture and engineering; regulation.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property and to promote the public welfare, the professions of architecture and engineering are declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. The practice of architecture and engineering and use of the titles architect or professional engineer is a privilege granted by the state through the board based on the qualifications of the individual as evidenced by a certificate of licensure which is not transferable.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 2.
August 30, 2015